Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1597YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.376, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. (1) A person applying for employment or employed as 3 a school bus driver shall successfully complete a department of 4 education approved course of instruction for school bus drivers 5 before or within the first six months of employment and . 6 (2) The department of education shall accept proof that a 7 person successfully completed entry-level driver training in 8 accordance with section 321.188, subsection 1, paragraph âcâ , 9 if such training meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt. 380, 10 Appendix C, and 49 C.F.R. pt. 380, Appendix D, as completion of 11 an approved course of instruction for school bus drivers. 12 (3) The department of education may adopt rules pursuant 13 to chapter 17A to establish requirements for providers of 14 entry-level driver training to comply with this paragraph. 15 b. A person employed as a school bus driver shall 16 successfully complete a department of education approved 17 course of instruction for school bus drivers at least every 18 twenty-four months thereafter. 19 c. If an employee fails to provide an employer with a 20 certificate of completion of the required school bus driverâs 21 course authorized under paragraph âaâ , the driverâs employer 22 shall report the failure to the department of education and 23 the employeeâs authorization to operate a school bus shall 24 be revoked. The department of education shall send notice 25 of the revocation to both the employee and the employer. A 26 person whose school bus authorization has been revoked under 27 this section shall not be issued another authorization until 28 certification of the completion of an approved school bus 29 driverâs course in accordance with paragraph âaâ is received by 30 the department of education. 31